Washington statutes.
RCW 18.30.120

Requirements determined by secretary—License content.

(1) The licensing period, administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees shall be determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(2) The license shall contain, on its face, the address or addresses where the license holder will perform the denturist services.

[ 1996 c 191 s 12; 1995 c 1 s 13 (Initiative Measure No. 607, approved November 8, 1994).]